Tennessee, session 114, SB1485.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 66-24-114, is amended by deleting
the section and substituting:
(a) No deed of conveyance of real property, except for a deed of trust or
mortgage, shall be received for recording by any register of deeds unless there shall be
included thereon the name and address of a property owner and the name and address
of the person or entity responsible for the payment of the real property taxes.
(b)
(1) The name and address required pursuant to the receipt of a deed of
conveyance of real property under subsection (a) may be used as the basis for
obtaining service of process upon either party as an agent thereof, for failure to
pay real property taxes.
(2) As used in this subsection (b), "service of process" means the act of
bringing or sending notice of the filing of a motion or petition to the attention of
the opposing party by delivery of a copy of the motion or pleading to the
opposing party.
SECTION 2. This act takes effect July 1, 2026, the public welfare requiring it.
SB1485
009840
- 1 -